Washington statutes.
RCW 19.225.100

Prohibited acts.

An athlete agent may not intentionally:

(1) Give a student athlete or, if the athlete is a minor, a parent or guardian of the athlete materially false or misleading information or make a materially false promise or representation with the intent to influence the athlete, parent, or guardian to enter into an agency contract;

(2) Furnish anything of value to a student athlete or another individual, if to do so may result in loss of the athlete's eligibility to participate in the athlete's sport, unless:

(a) The agent notifies the athletic director of the educational institution at which the athlete is enrolled or at which the agent has reasonable grounds to believe the athlete intends to enroll, not later than seventy-two hours after giving the thing of value; and

(b) The athlete or, if the athlete is a minor, a parent or guardian of the athlete acknowledges to the agent in a record that receipt of the thing of value may result in loss of the athlete's eligibility to participate in the athlete's sport;

(3) Initiate contact, directly or indirectly, with a student athlete or, if the athlete is a minor, a parent or guardian of the athlete, to recruit or solicit the athlete, parent, or guardian to enter an agency contract unless providing the athlete with the athlete agent disclosure form as provided in RCW 19.225.030;

(4) Refuse or willfully fail to retain or produce in response to subpoena the records required by RCW 19.225.090;

(5) Fail to disclose information required by RCW 19.225.040;

(6) Provide materially false or misleading information in an athlete agent disclosure form;

(7) Predate or postdate an agency contract;

(8) Fail to notify a student athlete or, if the athlete is a minor, a parent or guardian of the athlete, before the athlete, parent, or guardian signs an agency contract for a particular sport that the signing may result in loss of the athlete's eligibility to participate in the athlete's sport;

(9) Encourage another individual to do any of the acts described in subsections (1) through (8) of this section on behalf of the agent;

(10) Encourage another individual to assist any other individual in doing any of the acts described in subsections (1) through (8) of this section on behalf of the agent;

(11) Ask or allow a student athlete to waive or attempt to waive rights under this chapter;

(12) Fail to give notice required under RCW 19.225.070; or

(13) Engage in the business of an athlete agent in this state: (a) At any time after conviction under RCW 19.225.110; or (b) within five years of entry of a civil judgment under RCW 19.225.120.

[ 2020 c 157 s 1; 2016 sp.s. c 13 s 10; 2002 c 131 s 11.]